apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="assuciarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>assuciànnu</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciari</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciamu</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciàmu</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciati</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciàti</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>assucia</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciate</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciàssiru</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assuciàssiru</l><r>assuciarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="cuminicarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>cuminicànnu</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicari</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicamu</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicàmu</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicati</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicàti</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminica</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicate</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicàssiru</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cuminicàssiru</l><r>cuminicarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="lamintarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>lamintànnu</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintari</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintamu</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintàmu</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintati</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintàti</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>laminta</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintate</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintàssiru</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lamintàssiru</l><r>lamintarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="pricipitarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>pricipitànnu</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitari</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitamu</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitàmu</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitati</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitàti</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipita</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitate</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitàssiru</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pricipitàssiru</l><r>pricipitarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="immagginarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>immagginànnu</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginari</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginamu</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginàmu</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginati</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginàti</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>immaggina</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginate</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginàssiru</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>immagginàssiru</l><r>immagginarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="lauriarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>lauriànnu</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriari</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriamu</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriàmu</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriati</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriàti</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>lauria</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriate</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriàssiru</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lauriàssiru</l><r>lauriarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="assuciarisi"><i></i><par n="assuciarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cuminicarisi"><i></i><par n="cuminicarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lamintarisi"><i></i><par n="lamintarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pricipitarisi"><i></i><par n="pricipitarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="immagginarisi"><i></i><par n="immagginarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lauriarisi"><i></i><par n="lauriarisi__vblex"/></e>
